pl: Interfejs wyświetlacza: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Inne
da: Skærmgrænseflade: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Andet
pt-BR: Interface do display: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Outro
pt-PT: Interface de ecrã: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Outro
cs: Rozhraní displeje: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Jiné
sk-SK: Rozhranie displeja: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Iné
ja: ディスプレイインターフェース: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; その他
fr: Interface d’affichage: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Autre
en: Display interface: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Other
sv: Bildskärmsgränssnitt: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Övrigt
zh-CN: 显示接口: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; 其他
lt-LT: Ekrano sąsaja: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Kita
hr-HR: Sučelje zaslona: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Ostalo
ko: 디스플레이 인터페이스: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; 기타
bg-BG: Интерфейс на дисплея: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Други
sl-SI: Vmesnik zaslona: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Drugo
th: อินเทอร์เฟซจอแสดงผล: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; อื่นๆ
vi: Giao diện hiển thị: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Khác
nl: Displayinterface: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Andere
de: Display-Schnittstelle: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Sonstiges
ru: Интерфейс дисплея: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Другой
tr: Ekran arayüzü: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Diğer
ro-RO: Interfață de afișare: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Altele
nb: Skjermgrensesnitt: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Annet
hu: Kijelzőinterfész: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Egyéb
es: Interfaz de pantalla: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Otros
it: Interfaccia del display: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Altro
zh-TW: 顯示介面: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; 其他
el: Διεπαφή οθόνης: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Άλλο
fi: Näytön rajapinta: DSI; HDMI; I²C; LVDS; MIPI (RGB/TTL); SPI; eDP; Muu